North Dakota, session 69, HB1454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 23-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Required vaccine - Opt - out procedure .
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a state agency, political subdivision, or any other
government entity may not require an individual to take or receive a vaccine or similar product
used to prevent a disease, unless there is a procedure made available for an op t - out for
health, religious, or philosophical reasons.
2. For a school, day care center, child care facility, head start program, or nursery school, section
23 - 07 - 17.1 must be followed for vaccines and vaccine op t - out procedures .

H. B. NO. 1454 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1454.
House Vote: Yeas 59 Nays 33 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 30 Nays 17 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State